Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-377
Insurance; joint, partnership, or limited liability company interest; policy terms.

To render an insurance policy effective by one partner, member, or part owner applicable to the interest of another partner, member, or owner, it is necessary that the terms of the policy should be such as are applicable to the joint, partnership, or limited liability company interest.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 66, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3202;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 36, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7801;

C.S.1929, § 44-336;

R.S.1943, § 44-377;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 221.